src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VI8b-Cond
0:tchífeadh	#;
+1P+Sg:tchífinn	#;
+1P+Sg+Emph:tchífinnse	#;
+2P+Sg:tchífeá	#;
+2P+Sg+Emph:tchífeása	#;
+1P+Pl:tchífimis	#;
+3P+Pl:tchífidís	#;
+Auto:tchífí	#;		
+Rel+Len:tchífeas	#;

LEXICON VI8b-PastImp		! Past Imperfect - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite

0:tchíodh	#;
+1P+Sg:tchínn	#;
+1P+Sg+Emph:tchínnse	#;
+2P+Sg:tchítheá	#;
+2P+Sg+Emph:tchítheása	#;
+1P+Pl:tchímis	#;
+1P+Pl+Emph:tchímisne	#;
+3P+Pl:tchídís	#;
+3P+Pl+Emph:tchídís-sean	#;
+Auto:tchítí	#;
+Rel+Len:tchíos	#;			! relative: a tchíos
!**************************************************************************


LEXICON VI8	! FEIC (Irregular)


+PresInd:0	VI8-PresInd;	!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PastInd:0	VI8-PastInd;
+PastInd:0	VI8-PastIndDep;
+FutInd:0	VI8-FutInd;
+PastImp:0	VI8-PastImp;

+Cond:0		VI8-Cond;	!*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood

+PresSubj:0	VI8-PresSubj;	!*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:0	VI8-PastSubj;

+Imper:0	VI8-Imper;	!*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood


LEXICON VI8-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:feiceann	SufNegQ;
!!0:feiceanns	NegQ;
+1P+Sg:feicim	NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:feicimse	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:feicimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:feicimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:feictear	NegQ;	! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel+Len:fheiceas	#;	! 

LEXICON VI8-PastInd		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite

+Len:chonaic		#;		
+1P+Sg+Len:chonac	#;
+1P+Sg+Emph+Len:chonacsa	#;
+2P+Sg+Len:chonaicís	#;
+2P+Sg+Emph+Len:chonaicíse	#;
+1P+Pl+Len:chonaiceamar	#;
+1P+Pl+Len+Var:chonacamar	#;		! variant
+1P+Pl+Emph+Len:chonaiceamarna	#;
+1P+Pl+Emph+Len+Var:chonacamarna	#;	! variant
+3P+Pl+Len:chonaiceadar	#;
+3P+Pl+Emph+Len:chonaiceadarsan	#;
+3P+Pl+Len+Var:chonacadar	#;		! variant
+3P+Pl+Emph+Len+Var:chonacadarsan	#;	! variant
+Auto+Len:chonacthas	#;		
+Auto+Len+Var:chonaictheas	#;		

LEXICON VI8-PastIndDep		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite Spléach

+Dep:faca		NegQDep;		
+Dep+2P+Sg:facaís	NegQDep;
+Dep+2P+Sg+Emph:facaíse	NegQDep;
+Dep+1P+Pl:facamar	NegQDep;
+Dep+1P+Pl+Emph:facamarna	NegQDep;
+Dep+3P+Pl:facadar	NegQDep;
+Dep+3P+Pl+Emph:facadarsan NegQDep;
+Dep+Auto:facthas	NegQDep;		

LEXICON VI8-FutInd		! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
0:feicfidh	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:feicfimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:feicfimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:feicfear	NegQ;		
+Rel+Len:fheicfeas	#;		

LEXICON VI8-PastImp		! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:feiceadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:feicinn	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:feicteá	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg+Emph:feicteása	NegQ2;
!!!+3P+Sg:feiceadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:feicimis	NegQ2;
!!!+2P+Pl:feiceadh	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:feicidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:feictí 	NegQ2;		

LEXICON VI8-Cond		! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

0:feicfeadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:feicfinn	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg+Emph:feicfinnse	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:feicfeá	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg+Emph:feicfeása	NegQ2;
!!!!+3P+Sg:feicfeadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:feicfimis	NegQ2;
!!!!+2P+Pl:feicfeadh	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:feicfidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:feicfí 	NegQ2;		


LEXICON VI8-PresSubj		! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láithreach
0:feice		NegSubj;
+1P+Pl:feicimid	NegSubj;
+Auto:feictear 	NegSubj;		

LEXICON VI8-PastSubj		! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite
+1P+Sg:feicinn	NegQ;
+2P+Sg:feicteá	NegQ;
+3P+Sg:feiceadh	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:feicimis	NegQ;
+2P+Pl:feiceadh	NegQ;
+3P+Pl:feicidís	NegQ;
+Auto:feictí	NegQ;		



LEXICON VI8-Imper		! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordafeiceach

+1P+Sg:feicim	NegImper;
+2P+Sg:feic	NegImper;
+3P+Sg:feiceadh NegImper;
+1P+Pl:feicimis NegImper;
+2P+Pl:feicigí	NegImper;
+3P+Pl:feicidís NegImper;
+Auto:feictear  NegImper;



!**************************************************************************

LEXICON VI9a	! DEIN (Irregular)

+PresInd:0	VI9a-PresInd;	!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PastInd:0	VI9a-PastInd; ! varient dhein not rinne
+PastImp:0	VI9a-PastImp;
+Imper:0	VI9a-Imper;	!*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood
+PresSubj:0	VI9a-PresSubj;	!*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood

LEXICON VI9a-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:deineann		SufNegQ;
!!0:deineanns		NegQ;
+1P+Sg:deinim		NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:deinimse	NegQ;
+2P+Sg:deinir		NegQ;
+1P+Pl:deinimid	NegQ;
+Auto:deintear		NegQ;	! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel+Len:dheineas		#; 	! 


LEXICON VI9a-PastInd		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite
+Len:dhein		#;		! varient !!!!
+1P+Sg+Len:dheineas	#;		! varient !!!!
+1P+Sg+Emph+Len:dheineas-sa	#;		! varient !!!!
+1P+Pl+Len:dheineamar	#;		! varient !!!!
+1P+Pl+Emph+Len:dheineamarna	#;		! varient !!!!
+3P+Pl+Len:dheineadar	#;		! varient !!!!
+3P+Pl+Emph+Len:dheineadarsan	#;		! varient !!!!
+Auto:deineadh		#;		! varient !!!!

LEXICON VI9a-PastImp		! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:deineadh		NegQ2;			!! varient
+1P+Sg:deininn		NegQ2;			!! varient
+1P+Sg+Emph:deininnse	NegQ2;			!! varient
+2P+Sg:deinteá		NegQ2;			!! varient
+2P+Sg+Emph:deinteása	NegQ2;			!! varient
+1P+Pl:deinimis		NegQ2;			!! varient
+3P+Pl:deinidís		NegQ2;			!! varient
+Auto:deintí 		NegQ2;			!! varient	


LEXICON VI9a-Imper		! Imperative Mood - Modh Ordaitheach

+1P+Sg:deinim		NegImper;
+2P+Sg:dein		NegImper;
+3P+Sg:deineadh		NegImper;
+1P+Pl:deinimis 	NegImper;
+2P+Pl:deinigí		NegImper;
+3P+Pl:deinidís	NegImper;
+Auto:deintear		NegImper;

LEXICON VI9a-PresSubj		! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
0:deine			NegQ;
+1P+Sg:deinead		NegQ;
+2P+Sg:deinir		NegQ;
+1P+Pl:deinimid		NegQ;
+3P+Pl:deinid		NegQ;
+Auto:deintear 		NegQ;		
!**************************************************************************

LEXICON VI9	! DÉAN (Irregular)

+PresInd:0	VI9-PresInd;	!*** Modh Táscach - Indicative Mood
+PastInd:0	VI9-PastInd;
+PastInd:0	VI9-PastIndDep;
+FutInd:0	VI9-FutInd;
+PastImp:0	VI9-PastImp;

+Cond:0		VI9-Cond;	!*** Modh Coinníollach - Condit. Mood

+PresSubj:0	VI9-PresSubj;	!*** Modh Foshuiteach - Subjunctive Mood
!!!!!+Verb+PastSubj:0	VI9-PastSubj;

+Imper:0	VI9-Imper;	!*** Modh Ordaitheach - Imperative Mood


LEXICON VI9-PresInd		! Present Tense - Aimsir Láithreach
0:déanann		SufNegQ; ! include -s suffix here eud may 2012
!!0:déananns		NegQ;
+1P+Sg:déanaim		NegQ;
+1P+Sg+Emph:déanaimse	NegQ;
+1P+Pl:déanaimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:déanaimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:déantar		NegQ;	! +Auto = Autonomous - saor briathar
+Rel+Len:dhéanas		#; 	! 

LEXICON VI9-PastInd		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!this assumes that rinne is lenited in past tense like reg. verbs rith etc.
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!therefore there will not be 2 forms generated (with and without +Len)
+Len:rinne			#;		
+1P+Sg+Len:rinneas		#;
+1P+Sg+Emph+Len:rinneas-sa	#;
+1P+Pl+Len:rinneamar		#;
+1P+Pl+Emph+Len:rinneamarna	#;
+3P+Pl+Len:rinneadar		#;
+3P+Pl+Emph+Len:rinneadarsan	#;
+Auto:rinneadh			#;		!! auto does not lenite


LEXICON VI9-PastIndDep		! Past Tense - Aimsir Chaite Spléach

+Dep:dearna		NegQDep;		
+Dep+1P+Pl:dearnamar	NegQDep;
+Dep+1P+Pl+Emph:dearnamarna	NegQDep;
+Dep+Auto:dearnadh		NegQDep;		

LEXICON VI9-FutInd		! Future Tense - Aimsir Fháistineach
0:déanfaidh		NegQ;
+1P+Pl:déanfaimid	NegQ;
+1P+Pl+Emph:déanfaimidne	NegQ;
+Auto:déanfar		NegQ;		
+Rel+Len:dhéanfas		#;		

LEXICON VI9-PastImp		! Imperfect  - Aimsir Ghnáthchaite ( past hab.)
0:déanadh		NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:déanainn		NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:déantá		NegQ2;
!!!!+3P+Sg:déanadh		NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:déanaimis	NegQ2;
!!!!+2P+Pl:déanadh		NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:déanaidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:déantaí 		NegQ2;		

LEXICON VI9-Cond		! Conditional Mood - Modh Coinníollach

0:déanfadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg:déanfainn	NegQ2;
+1P+Sg+Emph:déanfainnse	NegQ2;
+2P+Sg:déanfá		NegQ2;
+2P+Sg+Emph:déanfása		NegQ2;
!!!!!+3P+Sg:déanfadh	NegQ2;
+1P+Pl:déanfaimis	NegQ2;
!!!!!+2P+Pl:déanfadh	NegQ2;
+3P+Pl:déanfaidís	NegQ2;
+Auto:déanfaí		NegQ2;		


LEXICON VI9-PresSubj		! Present Subj. Mood - Modh Foshuiteach Láith.
0:déana			NegQ;
+1P+Pl:déanaimid	NegQ;
+Auto:déantar 		NegQ;		

LEXICON VI9-PastSubj		! Past Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuit. Caite
0:déanadh 		NegQ;
+1P+Sg:déanainn		NegQ;
+2P+Sg:déantá		NegQ;
!!!!!!+3P+Sg:déanadh 		NegQ;
+1P+Pl:déanaimis	NegQ;
!!!!!+2P+Pl:déanadh		NegQ;
+3P+Pl:déanaidís 	NegQ;
+Auto:déantaí    	NegQ;		
